New York, session 2025-2026, A1120.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 6-126 of the election law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 3 to read as follows: 3 3. A judicial district convention may be conducted in whole or in part 4 via video conference upon a minimum of seventy-two hours notice to the 5 members of the respective committee by mail, an appropriately titled 6 email, text or telephone call at an address or number expressly provided 7 in writing for the purpose of receiving such notices. Such notice shall 8 include instructions to participants on how to access the meeting by 9 such video conference. Where the convention is held in whole or in part 10 via video conference, the presiding officer shall afford a fair and 11 appropriate opportunity for persons eligible to attend to listen, hear, 12 and be heard, in a manner similar to that which would be afforded if the 13 meeting were held in person. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02368-01-5